District of Columbia statutes.
34-201

“Commission” defined.

For the purpose of this subtitle the term “Commission” or “Public Service Commission” when used herein shall mean the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia or any successor Commission, which shall include any regulatory or other body that possesses or exercises the same or similar powers, functions, duties, and obligations exercised or possessed by the Commission on May 9, 2000.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(1), 47 DCR 1091

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1311.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-201.
1973 Ed., § 43-101.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-107 inserted “or ‘Public Service Commission”’ following “Commission” and substituted the concluding language for “created by this section.”